Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,132
Insurer; alternative reports authorized; supplemental report.

For purposes of sections 38-1,129 and 38-1,130, the department shall accept reports made to it under the Nebraska Hospital-Medical Liability Act or in accordance with national practitioner data bank requirements of the federal Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 1986, as such act existed on January 1, 2007, and may require a supplemental report to the extent such reports do not contain the information required by the department. For purposes of sections 38-1,129 and 38-1,130, the department shall accept a copy of a report made to any governmental agency charged by law with carrying out any of the provisions of the Uniform Credentialing Act or any person authorized by law to make arrests within the State of Nebraska and may require a supplemental report to the extent such copy does not contain the information required by the department.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 132.

Nebraska Hospital-Medical Liability Act, see section 44-2855.